Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.020

Prohibition against deceptively similar campaign materials. (Effective until January 1, 2025.)

No person or entity may publish or distribute any campaign material that is deceptively similar in design or appearance to a voters' pamphlet that was published by the secretary of state during the ten-year period before the publication or distribution of the campaign material by the person or entity. The secretary of state shall take reasonable measures to prevent or to stop violations of this section. Such measures may include, among others, petitioning the superior court for a temporary restraining order or other appropriate injunctive relief. In addition, the secretary may request the superior court to impose a civil fine on a violator of this section. The court is authorized to levy on and recover from each violator a civil fine not to exceed the greater of: (1) Two dollars for each copy of the deceptive material distributed, or (2) one thousand dollars. In addition, the violator is liable for the state's legal expenses and other costs resulting from the violation. Any funds recovered under this section must be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund.

[ 2003 c 111 s 802; 1984 c 41 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.04.035.]

PDFRCW 29A.32.020

Prohibition against deceptively similar campaign materials. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

No person or entity may publish or distribute any campaign material that is deceptively similar in design or appearance to a voters' pamphlet that was published by the secretary of state during the 10-year period before the publication or distribution of the campaign material by the person or entity. The secretary of state shall take reasonable measures to prevent or to stop violations of this section. Such measures may include, among others, petitioning the superior court for a temporary restraining order or other appropriate injunctive relief. In addition, the secretary may request the superior court to impose a civil fine on a violator of this section. The court is authorized to levy on and recover from each violator a civil fine not to exceed the greater of: (1) $5 for each copy of the deceptive material distributed, or (2) $10,000. In addition, the violator is liable for the state's legal expenses and other costs resulting from the violation. Any funds recovered under this section must be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund.

[ 2024 c 78 s 2; 2003 c 111 s 802; 1984 c 41 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.04.035.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 78: See note following RCW 29A.32.010.